Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-2128
Motorcycle safety instructor preparation
course; department; duties.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations developing a
motorcycle safety instructor preparation course which shall be taught by motorcycle trainers. Such
course shall insure that the motorcycle
safety instructor who
successfully passes the course is familiar with the material included
in the particular motorcycle safety course which such motorcycle safety instructor will be teaching.

Laws 1981, LB 22, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 1089, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 60-2113;

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 9.